Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.050

Initial appointments to the Washington grain commission—Expiration of interim terms.

(1) The Washington grain commission replaces the Washington wheat commission and the Washington barley commission. To accomplish this transition, the initial appointments to the Washington grain commission are as follows:

(a) Within thirty days of July 26, 2009, the Washington wheat commission shall forward to the director the names of the currently appointed wheat producer members who shall be appointed to the interim terms specified in subsection (2) of this section. Thereafter, wheat producer members are nominated and appointed under RCW 15.115.060 and 15.115.080.

(b) Within thirty days of July 26, 2009, the Washington barley commission shall forward to the director the names of two currently appointed producer members, one who resides in and is a barley producer in district VI and one who resides in and is a barley producer in district VII who shall be appointed to the interim terms specified in subsection (2) of this section. Thereafter, barley producer members are nominated and appointed under RCW 15.115.060 and 15.115.080.

(c) Within thirty days of July 26, 2009, the Washington wheat commission shall forward to the director the names of the currently appointed wheat industry representative members who shall be appointed to the interim terms specified in subsection (3) of this section. Thereafter the director shall appoint wheat industry representative members under RCW 15.115.070 and 15.115.080.

(d) Within thirty days of July 26, 2009, the Washington barley commission shall forward to the director the name of one of the currently appointed barley industry representative members who shall be appointed to the interim term specified in subsection (3) of this section. Thereafter the director shall appoint the barley industry representative member under RCW 15.115.070 and 15.115.080.

(2) Interim terms for producer members expire as follows:

(a) Districts I, IV, and VII: December 31, 2010; and

(b) Districts II, III, V, and VI: December 31, 2011.

(3) Interim terms for industry representative members expire as follows:

(a) Barley industry representative: December 31, 2010;

(b) Wheat industry representative (position 1): December 31, 2010; and

(c) Wheat industry representative (position 2): December 31, 2011.

(4) The initial appointments under this section must be made within sixty days of July 26, 2009.

[ 2009 c 33 s 5.]